Alaska statutes. Title 46. Water, Air, Energy, and Environmental Conservation.
Article 1. Release Prevention and Response Fund; Reimbursement; Liens.

Sec. 46.08.005.
Purpose of fund; description of accounts.

The legislature finds and declares that the release of oil or hazardous substances into the environment presents a real and substantial threat to the public health and welfare, to the environment, and to the economy of the state. The legislature therefore concludes that it is in the best interest of the state and its citizens to provide a fund containing two accounts. Within the fund,

one account consists of money readily available to the commissioner for the payment of the expenses incurred by the department during a response to a release or threatened release of oil or hazardous substances when authorized by AS

46.08.045

and for related purposes intended to address those releases;

the other account consists of money that the state may use during a response to a release of oil or a hazardous substance, other than one described in (1) of this section, and to a threatened release of oil or a hazardous substance, to pay the expenses of making preparations for the possibility of a release or threatened release of oil or hazardous substances, to reduce the amount, degree, or intensity of a release or threatened release, and for other related purposes identified in law.

History.

(§ 1 ch 59 SLA 1986; am § 2 ch 48 SLA 1991; am § 20 ch 128 SLA 1994; am § 59 ch 22 SLA 2015)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2015, the word “section” was substituted for “subsection” in paragraph (2).

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective May 15, 2015, in (1), substituted “department” for “department of environmental conservation” following “expenses incurred by”.

Sec. 46.08.010.
Fund established.

There is established in the state general fund the oil and hazardous substance release prevention and response fund. The fund shall be administered by the commissioner. The fund is composed of two accounts,

the oil and hazardous substance release prevention account;

the oil and hazardous substance release response account.

Money from an appropriation made to an account in the fund remaining in that account at the end of a fiscal year does not lapse and remains available for expenditure in successive fiscal years.

The fund shall be used for actual expenses incurred under AS

46.08.040

. Except as provided in AS

46.08.040

(a)(2)(D) for the acquisition, repair, or improvement of assets as preparedness measures, the fund may not be used for capital improvements.

History.

(§ 1 ch 59 SLA 1986; am § 3 ch 48 SLA 1991; am §§ 21 — 23 ch 128 SLA 1994)

Editor’s notes. —

Some refer to the fund established by this section as “the Four-Seventy Fund” because this section was enacted by SCS CSHB 470(FIN)(14th Legislature).

Sec. 46.08.020.
Financing of the oil and hazardous substance release prevention account; prevention mitigation account.

The legislature may appropriate from the following sources to the prevention account in the fund:

the annual estimated balance of the account maintained under AS

37.05.142

for deposits into the general fund of the proceeds of the oil conservation surcharge levied by AS

43.55.300

;

money received from other state sources, from federal or other sources, or from a private donor;

money recovered or otherwise received from parties responsible for the containment and cleanup of oil or a hazardous substance at a specific site, but excluding money

from performance bonds and other forms of financial responsibility held in escrow pending satisfactory performance of a privately financed response action; and

described in AS

46.08.025(a)(3)

;

fines, penalties, or damages recovered under AS

46.08.005

—

46.08.080

or other law for costs incurred by the state as a result of the release or threatened release of oil or a hazardous substance; and

the interest earned on the balance of the accounts maintained under AS

37.05.142

for deposits into the general fund from the proceeds of the surcharges levied under AS

43.55.201

and

43.55.300

.

Money received by the state under (a)(2) — (5) of this section shall be deposited in the general fund and credited to a special account called the “oil and hazardous substance release prevention mitigation account.” The legislature may annually appropriate to the prevention account in the fund from the prevention mitigation account a sum equal to the amount received under (a)(2) — (5) of this section during the calendar year preceding the legislative session in which the appropriations are to be made.

The interest earned on the balances of each of the following accounts shall be deposited into the general fund and credited to the prevention account in the fund:

the prevention account;

the prevention mitigation account;

the response account; and

the response mitigation account.

History.

(§ 1 ch 59 SLA 1986; am §§ 24, 25 ch 128 SLA 1994)

Revisor’s notes. —

A reference to “AS

46.08.005

—

46.08.080

” was substituted for “this chapter” in (a)(4) of this section in 1989 to reflect the enactment of AS

46.08.100

— 46.04.190.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Air releases of hazardous substances are covered by the Release Response Fund (AS

46.08.050

—

46.08.900

). Oct. 9, 1991 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 46.08.025.
Financing of the oil and hazardous substance release response account; release mitigation account.

The legislature may appropriate from the following sources to the oil and hazardous substance release response account in the fund:

the annual estimated balance of the account maintained under AS

37.05.142

for deposit into the general fund of the proceeds of the oil conservation surcharge levied by AS

43.55.201

;

money received from other state sources, from federal or other sources, or from a private donor; and

money recovered or otherwise received from parties responsible for the containment and cleanup of oil or a hazardous substance at a specific site for which the state expended money from the former oil and hazardous substance release response fund before October 2, 1994 or for which the state expended money from the response account, but excluding

money from performance bonds and other forms of financial responsibility held in escrow pending satisfactory performance of a privately financed response action;

fines, penalties, and damages described in AS

46.08.020(a)(4)

.

Money received by the state under (a)(2) and (3) of this section shall be deposited in the general fund and credited to a special account called the “oil and hazardous substance release response mitigation account.” The legislature may annually appropriate to the response account in the fund from the response mitigation account a sum equal to the amount received under (a)(2) and (3) of this section during the calendar year preceding the legislative session in which the appropriations are to be made.

History.

(§ 26 ch 128 SLA 1994)

Sec. 46.08.030.
Intent concerning the abatement of oil or hazardous substance releases.

It is the intent of the legislature and declared to be the public policy of the state that funds for the abatement of a release of oil or a hazardous substance will always be available.

History.

(§ 1 ch 59 SLA 1986)

Sec. 46.08.040.
Uses of the fund.

In addition to money in the response account of the fund that is transferred to the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development to make grants under AS

29.60.510

and to pay for impact assessments under AS

29.60.560

, the commissioner of environmental conservation may use money

from the response account in the fund

when authorized by AS

46.08.045

, to investigate and evaluate the release or threatened release of oil or a hazardous substance, and contain, clean up, and take other necessary action, such as monitoring and assessing, to address a release or threatened release of oil or a hazardous substance that poses an imminent and substantial threat to the public health or welfare, or to the environment;

to provide matching funds in the event of a release of oil or a hazardous substance for which use of the response account is authorized by AS

46.08.045

for participation

in federal oil discharge cleanup activities; and

under 42 U.S.C. 9601 — 9657 (Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act of 1980); and

to recover the costs to the state, a municipality, a village, or a school district of a containment and cleanup resulting from the release or the threatened release of oil or a hazardous substance for which money was expended from the response account;

from the prevention account in the fund to

investigate and evaluate the release or threatened release of oil or a hazardous substance, except a release described in AS

46.08.045(a)

, and contain, clean up, and take other necessary action, such as monitoring and assessing, to address a release or threatened release of oil or a hazardous substance, except a release described in AS

46.08.045(a)

;

pay all costs incurred

to establish and maintain the oil and hazardous substance response office;

under agreements entered into under AS

46.04.090

or AS

46.09.040

;

to review oil discharge prevention and contingency plans submitted under AS

46.04.030

;

to conduct training, response exercises, inspections, and tests, in order to verify equipment inventories and ability to prevent and respond to oil and hazardous substance release emergencies, and to undertake other activities intended to verify or establish the preparedness of the state, a municipality, or a party required by AS

46.04.030

to have an approved contingency plan to act in accordance with that plan; and

to verify or establish proof of financial responsibility required by AS

46.04.040

;

pay, when presented with appropriate documentation by the Department of Military and Veterans’ Affairs, the expenses incurred by the Department of Military and Veterans’ Affairs for Alaska State Emergency Response Commission activities, including staff support, when the activities and staff support relate to oil or hazardous substances, and for the costs of being prepared for responding to a request by the department for support in response and restoration, but not including the costs of maintaining the response corps and the emergency response depots under AS

26.23.045

;

pay all costs incurred to acquire, repair, or improve an asset having an anticipated life of more than one year and that is acquired, repaired, or improved as a preparedness measure by which the state may respond to, recover from, reduce, or eliminate the effects of a release or threatened release of oil or a hazardous substance;

pay the costs, if approved by the commissioner, that were incurred by local emergency planning committees to carry out the duties assigned them by AS

26.23.073(g)

;

provide matching funds in the event of the release of oil or a hazardous substance, except a release of oil for the containment and cleanup of which use of the response account is authorized by AS 46.08.045, for participation

in federal oil discharge cleanup activities; and

under 42 U.S.C. 9601 — 9657 (Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act of 1980);

[Repealed, § 2 ch 102 SLA 2006.]

transfer to the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development for payment by the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development of

municipal impact grants when authorized under AS

29.60.510(b)(2)

;

assessments of the social and economic effects of the release of oil or hazardous substances as required by AS

29.60.560

when, in the judgment of the commissioner, the release of oil or a hazardous substance is not one that is described in AS 46.08.045; and

grants to repair, improve, or replace fuel storage facilities under the bulk fuel system emergency repair and upgrade program;

recover the costs to the state, a municipality, a village, or a school district of a containment and cleanup resulting from the release or threatened release of oil or a hazardous substance for which money was expended from the prevention account;

prepare, review, and revise

the state’s master oil and hazardous substance discharge prevention and contingency plan required by AS

46.04.200

; and

a regional master oil and hazardous substance discharge prevention and contingency plan required by AS

46.04.210

; and

restore the environment by addressing the effects of an oil or hazardous substance release.

[Repealed, § 43 ch 128 SLA 1994.]

Notwithstanding other provisions of this section, money from the fund may not be used for a purpose specified in (a)(1)(B) or (C) or (a)(2) of this section unless money is available from an appropriation made specifically for that purpose. The legislature may use not more than three percent of the estimated annual balance of the prevention account to make appropriations for the purposes described in (a)(2)(E) of this section.

[Repealed, § 43 ch 128 SLA 1994.]

History.

(§ 1 ch 59 SLA 1986; am § 3 ch 90 SLA 1989; am § 2 ch 113 SLA 1989; am §§ 14, 15 ch 190 SLA 1990; am § 28 ch 191 SLA 1990; am § 3 ch 199 SLA 1990; am §§ 4, 5 ch 48 SLA 1991; am § 15 ch 83 SLA 1991; am § 23 ch 32 SLA 1994; am §§ 27 — 29, 43 ch 128 SLA 1994; am § 98 ch 21 SLA 2000; am § 19 ch 41 SLA 2002; am § 2 ch 102 SLA 2006)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in (a) of this section, “commissioner of community and regional affairs” was changed to read “commissioner of community and economic development” and “Community and Regional Affairs” was changed to “Community and Economic Development” in accordance with § 91(a)(13), ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, in (a) of this section, “commissioner of community and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development” and “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Air releases of hazardous substances are covered by the Release Response Fund (AS

46.08.050

—

46.08.900

). Oct. 9, 1991 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 46.08.045.
Use of the response account; declared disasters.

The commissioner may use money from the response account in the fund to respond to a release or threatened release when the governor declares a disaster related to an oil or hazardous substance discharge emergency under AS

26.23.020(c)

. During the effective period of the disaster emergency, the commissioner may use money from the response account to respond to the disaster emergency.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, money from the response account may be used for the purpose in AS

46.08.040(a)(1)(A)

without a declaration under AS

26.23.020(c)

. However, when exercising authority under this subsection, the commissioner shall, within 120 hours of using money in the response account when authorized by this subsection, provide a written report to the governor and to the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee summarizing the release, the state’s actions, both taken and anticipated, the costs of the state’s actions, both taken and anticipated, and other information considered appropriate by the commissioner or the governor. The governor may, at any time during the state’s response, approve, disapprove, or amend the action.

History.

(§ 30 ch 128 SLA 1994)

Sec. 46.08.050.
Records of the fund.

The department shall maintain accounting records showing the income and expenses of the fund.

A department that is appropriated or allocated money from the fund, either directly or through a reimbursable service agreement with the Department of Environmental Conservation, shall develop procedures governing the expenditure of, and accounting for, money it expends from the fund. The Department of Environmental Conservation may not reimburse or pay money to another state agency for the agency’s activities under AS

46.08.040

unless the state agency provides to the department the information necessary to complete the report required by AS

46.08.060

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 59 SLA 1986; am § 31 ch 128 SLA 1994)

Sec. 46.08.060.
Report.

The commissioner shall make available a report to the legislature not later than the 10th day following the convening of each first regular session of the legislature. The commissioner shall notify the legislature that the report is available. The report may include information considered significant by the commissioner but must include

the amount of money expended by the department under AS

46.08.040(a)

during the preceding two fiscal years;

the amount and source of money received and money recovered by or on behalf of the department during the preceding two fiscal years under

AS

46.08.020

; and

AS

46.08.025

;

a summary of municipal participation in the department’s responses that were paid for by the fund;

a detailed summary of department activities in responses paid for by the fund during the preceding two fiscal years, including response descriptions and statements outlining the nature of the threat; in this paragraph, “detailed” includes information describing each personal services position and total compensation for that position, each contract in excess of $10,000, and each purchase in excess of $10,000; and

the projected cost to the department for the next two fiscal years of monitoring, operating, and maintaining sites where response has been completed or is expected to be continued during the next two fiscal years.

As part of the department’s on-going identification efforts associated with oil spill or hazardous substance release or waste sites, the commissioner shall include in the report under this section

the number of sites that are included in the department’s contaminated sites data base, whether the site is active or closed; and

a prioritized listing of those sites, both statewide and by community, based on the immediate and long-term threats to the public health or welfare or to the environment.

In addition to the department’s report required under (a) of this section, the governor shall submit a report about use of the fund during the previous two fiscal years to the legislature not later than the 10th day following the convening of each first regular session of the legislature. In the report, the governor shall describe in detail the governor’s use of money from the fund, with separate explanations, by agency, of the activities that were paid for under the authority of AS

46.08.045

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 59 SLA 1986; am §§ 16, 17 ch 190 SLA 1990; am § 29 ch 191 SLA 1990; am §§ 32 — 34 ch 128 SLA 1994; am § 106 ch 21 SLA 1995; am §§ 17, 18 ch 6 SLA 1998)

Sec. 46.08.070.
Reimbursement for containment and cleanup.

Except as provided in (e) of this section, the commissioner shall seek reimbursement promptly under this section, AS

46.03.760(d)

, or federal law for the cost incurred in the cleanup or containment of oil or a hazardous substance that has been released.

The attorney general, at the request of the commissioner, shall immediately seek to recover money expended by the department under AS

46.08.005

—

46.08.080

or other law to contain and clean up oil or a hazardous substance that has been released or to control the threatened release of oil or a hazardous substance.

The department shall reimburse a municipality or village for actual expenses, other than normal operating expenses, incurred in the abatement of a release or threatened release and may advance money to a municipality or village to carry out an emergency first response to a release or threatened release of oil or a hazardous substance if

the municipality or village has entered into an agreement with the commissioner under AS

46.04.020(e)

or AS

46.09.020(e)

; and

the commissioner determines that

the expenses to be reimbursed were for a necessary emergency first response to a release or threatened release that, at the time of the release or threatened release, posed an imminent and substantial threat to the public health or welfare or to the environment;

the municipality or village has demonstrated a need for financial assistance, and the money to be advanced is necessary to enable the municipality or village to carry out an emergency first response to a release or threatened release that, at the time of the release or threatened release, poses an imminent and substantial threat to the public health or welfare, or to the environment; and

containment and cleanup efforts paid for in whole or in part by a reimbursement or an advance made under this section were consistent with the regional master plan for the region in which the municipality or village is located if a plan has been prepared by the department under AS

46.04.210

.

The department shall adopt regulations to implement the cost recovery requirements of (a) and (b) of this section, but may not delay cost recovery actions pending the effective date of the adoption of the regulations. The department may adopt regulations to implement the provisions of (e) of this section.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section and for a person otherwise liable under AS

46.03.822

, the department may waive all or a portion of the response costs incurred by the department in the cleanup or containment of oil or a hazardous substance that has been released if the department makes a written finding that

the release was from piping, tankage, or other equipment used solely to provide heat or electrical power generation for a building used primarily for residential purposes and that does not consist of more than four dwelling units;

the person did not wilfully or negligently fail to comply with spill prevention, reporting, and response requirements of the department applicable to the release or the property where the release occurred;

the person took immediate measures upon discovery of the release to contain the release where possible; and

the person provided reasonable assistance to the department and other governmental entities that responded to the release, including providing reasonable access to the property where the release occurred and providing information requested by the department about the release and property.

History.

(§ 1 ch 59 SLA 1986; am §§ 1, 2 ch 29 SLA 1989; am § 16 ch 83 SLA 1991; am § 35 ch 128 SLA 1994; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 113 SLA 2018)

Revisor’s notes. —

A reference to “AS

46.08.005

—

46.08.080

” was substituted for “this chapter” in (b) of this section in 1989 to reflect the enactment of AS

46.08.100

—

46.08.190

.

In 2000, in subsection (a), “AS

46.03.760(d)

” was substituted for “AS

46.03.760(e)

” to reflect the 1995 relettering of AS

46.03.760(e)

.

Cross references. —

For authority of municipalities for containment and cleanup of oil and hazardous substances, see AS

46.09.060(b)

.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective January 15, 2019, in (a), added “Except as provided in (e) of this section,” and made a related change; in (d), added the second sentence; added (e).

Editor's notes. —

Under sec. 5, ch. 113, SLA 2018, the 2018 changes to this section are retroactive to January 1, 2018.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor's transmittal letter for ch. 113, SLA 2018 (SB 158), which amended (a) and (d) and added (e), see 2018 Senate Journal 1815 — 1816.

Sec. 46.08.075.
Liens against property as security for state expenditures.

The state has a lien for expenditures by the state from the fund, or from any other state fund, for the costs of response, containment, removal, or remedial action resulting from an oil or hazardous substance release, or, with respect to response costs, for the costs of response to a threatened release of oil or a hazardous substance, against all property owned by a person who is determined by the commissioner to be liable for the expenditures under this chapter, AS 46.03, AS 46.04, 42 U.S.C. 9607, or other state or federal law. The lien includes interest, at the maximum rate allowable under AS

45.45.010(a)

, from the date of the expenditures. The state may file an action in a court of competent jurisdiction in order to foreclose on the lien.

A lien established under this section against real property is not effective until

a certificate of lien is recorded in the district recorder’s office for the district in which the property is located, describing the property and stating the amount of the lien, the name of the owner as grantor, and, if known, the name of the person causing the oil or hazardous substance release; and

the commissioner sends a copy of the certificate of lien by certified mail return receipt requested, or actually delivers a copy of the certificate of lien, to the persons described in (1) of this subsection and to all other persons of record holding an interest in the property.

When any amount with respect to which a lien has been recorded under this section has been paid or reduced, the commissioner shall, upon request of the property owner, issue a certificate discharging or partially releasing the lien. That certificate may be recorded in the office in which the certificate of lien was recorded.

The commissioner may, in the commissioner’s discretion, reduce, discharge or partially release a lien under this section if a bond, or other security, in a form and an amount satisfactory to the commissioner is posted. The bond or other security must include an amount sufficient to cover the cost of execution, collection, or foreclosure, including attorney fees. A reduction, discharge, or partial release may not be granted under this subsection if it would be contrary to the public interest. When a lien is reduced, discharged, or partially released under this subsection, the commissioner shall, at the request of the property owner, issue a certificate to that effect.

A person with an ownership interest in property against which a lien is recorded may bring an action in a court of competent jurisdiction to require that the lien be released. The lien may be released to the extent of that person’s ownership interest if the court finds that the person is not liable for the expenses incurred by the state in connection with the costs of response, containment, removal, or remedial action resulting from the release or from the threatened release, of oil or a hazardous substance.

History.

(§ 7 ch 39 SLA 1989; am §§ 36, 37 ch 128 SLA 1994)

Sec. 46.08.080.
Regulations.

The commissioner shall periodically review the minimum quantities of hazardous substances established under federal law and may adopt regulations establishing minimum quantities of substances for all or any portion of the substances to which AS

46.08.005

—

46.08.080

otherwise apply. The commissioner may otherwise adopt only those regulations that are expressly required to implement the specific purposes of AS

46.08.005

—

46.08.080

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 59 SLA 1986)

Revisor’s notes. —

References to “AS

46.08.005

—

46.08.080

” were substituted for “this chapter” in this section, with a corresponding minor word change, in 1989 to reflect the enactment of AS

46.08.100

—

46.08.190

.